Massachusetts, session 194th, H4987.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. To provide for a program of transportation development and improvements, 
the sums set forth in sections 2 through 2B, inclusive, for the several purposes, and subject to the 
conditions specified in this act, are hereby made available, subject to the laws regulating the 
disbursement of public funds. The sums made available in this act shall be in addition to any 
amounts previously appropriated or made available for these purposes. 
SECTION 2. 
MASSACHUSETTS DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 
Highway Division 
6122-2730  For the construction and reconstruction of municipal ways as described in 
clause (b) of the second paragraph of section 4 of chapter 6C of the General Laws; provided, that 

of 7 11 a city or town shall comply with the procedures established by the Massachusetts Department of 
Transportation; provided further, that a city or town may expend, without further appropriation, 
for these projects amounts not in excess of the amount provided to the city or town under this 
item upon preliminary notice of such amount, which shall be provided by the department to the 
city or town not later than March 1 of each year; and provided further, that the commonwealth  
shall reimburse funds to a city or town under this item, subject to the availability of funds as 
provided in section 9G of chapter 29 of the General Laws, within 30 days after receipt by the 
department of a request for reimbursement from the city or town; provided further, that the 
department shall expend up to $400,000,000 for construction and reconstruction of municipal 
ways which shall be allocated to municipalities based on local road mileage under procedures 
established by the department; provided further, that the department shall encourage long-term 
capital plans to be developed by a city or town describing how they will use this funding; and 
provided further, that the city or town shall provide to the department its certification by the city 
or town that actual expenses have been incurred on projects eligible for funding under this item 
and that the work has been completed to the satisfaction of the city or town according to the 
specifications of the project plan, and in compliance with applicable laws and procedures 
established by the department.....................................................$1,200,000,000 
SECTION 2A. 
MASSACHUSETTS DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 
Highway Division 
6121-2717 For the bridge and pavement lifecycle asset management program, including, 
but not limited to, design, construction and repair of, or improvements to, non-federally aided 

of 7 33 roadway and bridge projects and for the nonparticipating portion of federally-aided projects and 
for the construction, reconstruction, resurfacing, repair and improvement of pavement and 
surface conditions on non-federally aided roadways, including, but not limited to, state numbered 
routes and municipal roadways; provided, that expenditures from this item may include the costs 
of engineering, design, permitting, climate change adaptation and resilience and other services 
essential to projects under this item; provided further, that funds may be expended from this item 
for matching grants to municipalities related to repair of surface conditions on paved and 
unpaved public ways; provided further, that the department may expend funds from this item to 
improve the condition of bicycle and pedestrian accommodations related to such roadway, 
bridge, pavement and resurfacing projects; and provided further, that the department shall 
consider lifecycle asset management and resilient design with respect to projects under this 
item.............................. $500,000,000 
6121-2768 For a program of transportation capital projects to support development of 
housing, including but not limited to, the costs of planning, design and engineering and other 
services for those projects rendered by commonwealth employees and consultants; construction 
and reconstruction of roadways, bridges, pavements, culverts, bicycle and pedestrian 
infrastructure, safety and accessibility improvements, landscape improvements, lighting, climate 
resilience, and stormwater management improvements; provided, further, that the secretary of 
transportation shall consult with the secretary of housing and livable communities and the 
secretary for administration and finance on prioritization, selection and implementation of 
transportation capital projects to be funded from this item; provided, further, that this item may 
be used by the secretary of transportation to provide grants to municipalities for transportation 
capital projects to support development of housing in those municipalities, in consultation with 

of 7 56 the secretary of housing and livable communities and the secretary for administration and 
finance ………………$200,000,000 
6121-2737 For the Parkway Resilience Improvement and Safety Modernization (PRISM) 
investment program, an accelerated deferred maintenance, modernization, and safety program 
for  multi-modal transportation infrastructure under the care and control of the department of 
conservation and recreation, including but not limited to the planning, design, construction, 
reconstruction, repair, improvement, and rehabilitation of transportation infrastructure; the costs 
of planning, design and engineering and other services for those projects rendered by 
commonwealth employees and by consultants; provided, that funds may be expended for 
roadways, bridges, culverts, pavements, multi-modal transportation infrastructure, bicycle and 
pedestrian infrastructure, safety and accessibility improvements, intersection and landscape 
improvements, lighting, traffic signals and signage, and climate resilience and stormwater 
management improvements associated with transportation capital projects on transportation 
infrastructure under the care and control of the department; provided, further, that the secretary 
of transportation shall consult with the secretary of energy and environment and the secretary for 
administration and finance on coordination of transportation capital projects to be funded from 
this item, and the design of any project funded by this item shall be consistent with applicable 
historic parkways preservation treatment guidelines and parkways master plan to the extent 
practicable………………$200,000,000 
SECTION 2B. 
MASSACHUSETTS DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 
Office of the Secretary 

of 7 78  6622-2747 For the purpose of implementing rail improvements pursuant to chapter 161A 
of the General Laws, including upgrading and modernizing vehicles, new vehicle procurements, 
planning, design and acquisition of commuter rail 
locomotives……………………………………….…$200,000,000 
SECTION 3.  Item 6121-2214 of section 2 of chapter 176 of the acts of 2022 is hereby 
amended by striking out the figure “2,812,457,157” and inserting in place thereof the following 
figure:- 5,112,457,157. 
SECTION 4.  Item 6121-2217 of section 2A of said chapter 176 is hereby amended by 
striking out the figure “1,270,000,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:-
2,070,000,000. 
SECTION 5.  Item 6121-2228 of section 2B of said chapter 176 is hereby amended by 
striking out the figure “25,000,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 
90,000,000. 
SECTION 6.  Item 6720-2258 of section 2F of said chapter 176 is hereby amended by 
striking out the figure “10,000,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 
22,000,000. 
SECTION 7.  Section 41 of said chapter 176 is hereby amended by striking out the figure 
“611,800,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 1,071,800,000. 
SECTION 8.  Section 42 of said chapter 176 is hereby amended by striking out the figure 
“1,425,000,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 2,290,000,000. 

of 7 98  SECTION 9.  Section 46 of said chapter 176 is hereby amended by striking out the figure 
“1,750,860,795” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 1,762,860,795. 
100  SECTION 10.  To meet the expenditures necessary in carrying out sections 2 through 2B, 
101 inclusive, the state treasurer shall, upon request of the governor, issue and sell bonds of the 
102 commonwealth in an amount to be specified by the governor from time to time but not 
103 exceeding, in the aggregate, $2,300,000,000. All bonds issued by the commonwealth as aforesaid 
104 shall be designated on their face, Commonwealth Transportation Improvement Act of 2026, and 
105 shall be issued for a maximum term of years, not exceeding 30 years, as the governor may 
106 recommend to the general court under section 3 of Article LXII of the Amendments to the 
107 Constitution. All such bonds shall be payable not later than June 30, 2066, pursuant to said 
108 section 3 of said Article LXII. All interest and payments on account of principal on these 
109 obligations shall be payable from the General Fund or the Commonwealth Transportation Fund.  
110  SECTION 11.  Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, bonds and 
111 interest thereon issued under sections 2 through 2B, inclusive, shall be general obligations of the 
112 commonwealth; provided, however, that any bonds issued by the state treasurer under said 
113 sections, shall, upon the request of the governor, be issued as special obligation bonds pursuant 
114 to section 2O of chapter 29 of the General Laws; provided further, that in deciding whether to 
115 request the issuance of particular bonds as special obligations, the governor shall take into 
116 account: (i) generally prevailing financial market conditions; (ii) the impact of each approach on 
117 the overall capital financing plans and needs of the commonwealth; (iii) any ratings assigned to 
118 outstanding bonds of the commonwealth and any ratings expected to be assigned by any 
119 nationally-recognized credit rating agency to the bonds proposed to be issued; and (iv) any 
120 applicable provisions of a trust agreement or credit enhancement agreement entered into pursuant 

of 7 121 to said section 2O of said chapter 29. All interest and payments on account of obligations issued 
122 under this section as special obligation bonds pursuant to said section 2O of said chapter 29 shall 
123 be payable from the Commonwealth Transportation Fund, established in section 2ZZZ of said 
124 chapter 29, solely in accordance with said section 2O of said chapter 29, and such bonds shall 
125 not be included in the computation of outstanding bonds for purposes of the limit imposed by the 
126 second paragraph of section 60A of said chapter 29, nor shall debt service with respect to such 
127 bonds be included in the computation of the limit imposed by section 60B of said chapter 29.